North Dakota, session 69, HB1534.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 57-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Limitation on taxable valuation increases .
1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the taxable valuation on any parcel o f
taxable property may not exceed by more than three percent the amount of the
taxable valuation on that parcel of taxable property in the preceding taxable year,
except to the extent improvements to the property have been made which were not
included in the taxable valuation of the property in the preceding taxable year. The
limitation in this section applies regardless of a sale, transfer, or other change in
ownership of the property.
2. Taxable valuations exceeding the limitations under subsection 1 may be imposed upon
approval of a ballot measure, stating the proposed maximum allowable percentage
increase in taxable valuation, by a majority of the qualified electors of the taxing distric t
voting on the question at a statewide general or primary election. Taxable valuations
exceeding the limitations under subsection 1 may be approved by electors for no t
more than four taxable years at a time.
3. A city or county may not supersede or modify the application of this section under
home rule authority.
Page No. 1 25.0791.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act is effective for taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2024.
Page No. 2 25.0791.03000